Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STAIRSTEP FOUNDATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the director of Explore Minnesota for a grant to the Stairstep Foundation for African American cultural festivals and events. Grant funds may be used for infrastructure and associated costs for the festivals and events, including but not limited to buildout, permits, sanitation and maintenance services, transportation, staffing, event programming, public safety, facilities and equipment rentals, signage, and insurance. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end